Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.090

Procedure where accused is under arrest.

If the person charged with the commission of the offense has been arrested before the inquisition has been filed, the coroner shall deliver the recognizance and the inquisition, with the testimony taken, to the magistrate before whom such person may be brought, who shall return the same, with the depositions and statements taken before him or her to the clerk of the superior court of the county.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4036; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.090. Prior: Code 1881 s 2784; 1863 p 561 s 10; 1854 p 437 s 10; RRS s 4189.]